Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-3814
Political subdivisions; regulations; restrictions.

Except as otherwise provided in the Kratom Consumer Protection Act, no political subdivision shall impose additional restrictions on the manufacturing, packaging, labeling, distribution, or sale of kratom products greater than or in addition to those enumerated in the act.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 14.